Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB448.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.238, No.43), known as the Radon Certification Act, is amended to read:Section 9. Confidentiality of data.Except for use in conducting legitimate scientific studies, as determined by the department, data relating to individuals and data relating to radon gas and radon progeny contamination at nonpublic properties, including residential dwellings, gathered under this act shall be considered confidential by the department. The department shall not release the data in its possession to anyone other than the owner of the property[.], or a previous owner of the property if the previous owner owned the 1234567891011121314151617181920 property during the time in which the requested data was gathered.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0448PN0426 - 2 - 123